Delaware, session 153, HB76.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 2514, Title 11 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 2514. Arrest without warrant. The arrest of a person may be lawfully made by any peace officer or a private person, officer, without a warrant, upon reasonable information that the accused stands charged in the courts of a state with a crime punishable by death or imprisonment for a term exceeding 1 year, but when so arrested the accused shall be taken before a judge or justice of the peace with all practicable speed and complaint shall be made against the accused under oath setting forth the ground for the arrest as in Â§â2513 of this title, and thereafter the accusedâs answer shall be heard as if the accused had been arrested on a warrant.